Florida, session 2026, SB70.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 15 16 Section 1.âPresent subsections (27) and (28) of section 17 409.901, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (28) 18 and (29), respectively, and a new subsection (27) is added to 19 that section, to read: 20 409.901âDefinitions; ss. 409.901-409.920.âAs used in ss. 21 409.901-409.920, except as otherwise specifically provided, the 22 term: 23 (27)ââSerious mental illnessâ means any of the following 24 psychiatric disorders as defined in the Diagnostic and 25 Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, Fifth Edition, published 26 by the American Psychiatric Association: 27 (a)âBipolar disorders, including hypomanic, manic, 28 depressive, and mixed-feature episodes. 29 (b)âDepression in childhood or adolescence. 30 (c)âMajor depressive disorders, including single and 31 recurrent depressive episodes. 32 (d)âObsessive-compulsive disorders. 33 (e)âParanoid personality disorder or other psychotic 34 disorders. 35 (f)âSchizoaffective disorders, including bipolar or 36 depressive symptoms. 37 (g)âSchizophrenia. 38 Section 2.âParagraph (a) of subsection (5) of section 39 409.912, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 40 409.912âCost-effective purchasing of health care.âThe 41 agency shall purchase goods and services for Medicaid recipients 42 in the most cost-effective manner consistent with the delivery 43 of quality medical care. To ensure that medical services are 44 effectively utilized, the agency may, in any case, require a 45 confirmation or second physicianâs opinion of the correct 46 diagnosis for purposes of authorizing future services under the 47 Medicaid program. This section does not restrict access to 48 emergency services or poststabilization care services as defined 49 in 42 C.F.R. s. 438.114. Such confirmation or second opinion 50 shall be rendered in a manner approved by the agency. The agency 51 shall maximize the use of prepaid per capita and prepaid 52 aggregate fixed-sum basis services when appropriate and other 53 alternative service delivery and reimbursement methodologies, 54 including competitive bidding pursuant to s. 287.057, designed 55 to facilitate the cost-effective purchase of a case-managed 56 continuum of care. The agency shall also require providers to 57 minimize the exposure of recipients to the need for acute 58 inpatient, custodial, and other institutional care and the 59 inappropriate or unnecessary use of high-cost services. The 60 agency shall contract with a vendor to monitor and evaluate the 61 clinical practice patterns of providers in order to identify 62 trends that are outside the normal practice patterns of a 63 providerâs professional peers or the national guidelines of a 64 providerâs professional association. The vendor must be able to 65 provide information and counseling to a provider whose practice 66 patterns are outside the norms, in consultation with the agency, 67 to improve patient care and reduce inappropriate utilization. 68 The agency may mandate prior authorization, drug therapy 69 management, or disease management participation for certain 70 populations of Medicaid beneficiaries, certain drug classes, or 71 particular drugs to prevent fraud, abuse, overuse, and possible 72 dangerous drug interactions. The Pharmaceutical and Therapeutics 73 Committee shall make recommendations to the agency on drugs for 74 which prior authorization is required. The agency shall inform 75 the Pharmaceutical and Therapeutics Committee of its decisions 76 regarding drugs subject to prior authorization. The agency is 77 authorized to limit the entities it contracts with or enrolls as 78 Medicaid providers by developing a provider network through 79 provider credentialing. The agency may competitively bid single 80 source-provider contracts if procurement of goods or services 81 results in demonstrated cost savings to the state without 82 limiting access to care. The agency may limit its network based 83 on the assessment of beneficiary access to care, provider 84 availability, provider quality standards, time and distance 85 standards for access to care, the cultural competence of the 86 provider network, demographic characteristics of Medicaid 87 beneficiaries, practice and provider-to-beneficiary standards, 88 appointment wait times, beneficiary use of services, provider 89 turnover, provider profiling, provider licensure history, 90 previous program integrity investigations and findings, peer 91 review, provider Medicaid policy and billing compliance records, 92 clinical and medical record audits, and other factors. Providers 93 are not entitled to enrollment in the Medicaid provider network. 94 The agency shall determine instances in which allowing Medicaid 95 beneficiaries to purchase durable medical equipment and other 96 goods is less expensive to the Medicaid program than long-term 97 rental of the equipment or goods. The agency may establish rules 98 to facilitate purchases in lieu of long-term rentals in order to 99 protect against fraud and abuse in the Medicaid program as 100 defined in s. 409.913. The agency may seek federal waivers 101 necessary to administer these policies. 102 (5)(a)âThe agency shall implement a Medicaid prescribed 103 drug spending-control program that includes the following 104 components: 105 1.âA Medicaid preferred drug list, which shall be a listing 106 of cost-effective therapeutic options recommended by the 107 Medicaid Pharmacy and Therapeutics Committee established 108 pursuant to s. 409.91195 and adopted by the agency for each 109 therapeutic class on the preferred drug list. At the discretion 110 of the committee, and when feasible, the preferred drug list 111 should include at least two products in a therapeutic class. The 112 agency may post the preferred drug list and updates to the list 113 on an Internet website without following the rulemaking 114 procedures of chapter 120. Antiretroviral agents are excluded 115 from the preferred drug list. The agency shall also limit the 116 amount of a prescribed drug dispensed to no more than a 34-day 117 supply unless the drug productsâ smallest marketed package is 118 greater than a 34-day supply, or the drug is determined by the 119 agency to be a maintenance drug, in which case a 100-day maximum 120 supply may be authorized. The agency may seek any federal 121 waivers necessary to implement these cost-control programs and 122 to continue participation in the federal Medicaid rebate 123 program, or alternatively to negotiate state-only manufacturer 124 rebates. The agency may adopt rules to administer this 125 subparagraph. The agency shall continue to provide unlimited 126 contraceptive drugs and items. The agency must establish 127 procedures to ensure that: 128 a.âThere is a response to a request for prior authorization 129 by telephone or other telecommunication device within 24 hours 130 after receipt of a request for prior authorization; and 131 b.âA 72-hour supply of the drug prescribed is provided in 132 an emergency or when the agency does not provide a response 133 within 24 hours as required by sub-subparagraph a. 134 2.âA provider of prescribed drugs is reimbursed in an 135 amount not to exceed the lesser of the actual acquisition cost 136 based on the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services National 137 Average Drug Acquisition Cost pricing files plus a professional 138 dispensing fee, the wholesale acquisition cost plus a 139 professional dispensing fee, the state maximum allowable cost 140 plus a professional dispensing fee, or the usual and customary 141 charge billed by the provider. 142 3.âThe agency shall develop and implement a process for 143 managing the drug therapies of Medicaid recipients who are using 144 significant numbers of prescribed drugs each month. The 145 management process may include, but is not limited to, 146 comprehensive, physician-directed medical-record reviews, claims 147 analyses, and case evaluations to determine the medical 148 necessity and appropriateness of a patientâs treatment plan and 149 drug therapies. The agency may contract with a private 150 organization to provide drug-program-management services. The 151 Medicaid drug benefit management program shall include 152 initiatives to manage drug therapies for HIV/AIDS patients, 153 patients using 20 or more unique prescriptions in a 180-day 154 period, and the top 1,000 patients in annual spending. The 155 agency must shall enroll any Medicaid recipient in the drug 156 benefit management program if he or she meets the specifications 157 of this provision and is not enrolled in a Medicaid health 158 maintenance organization. 159 4.âThe agency may limit the size of its pharmacy network 160 based on need, competitive bidding, price negotiations, 161 credentialing, or similar criteria. The agency shall give 162 special consideration to rural areas in determining the size and 163 location of pharmacies included in the Medicaid pharmacy 164 network. A pharmacy credentialing process may include criteria 165 such as a pharmacyâs full-service status, location, size, 166 patient educational programs, patient consultation, disease 167 management services, and other characteristics. The agency may 168 impose a moratorium on Medicaid pharmacy enrollment if it is 169 determined that it has a sufficient number of Medicaid 170 participating providers. The agency must allow dispensing 171 practitioners to participate as a part of the Medicaid pharmacy 172 network regardless of the practitionerâs proximity to any other 173 entity that is dispensing prescription drugs under the Medicaid 174 program. A dispensing practitioner must meet all credentialing 175 requirements applicable to his or her practice, as determined by 176 the agency. 177 5.âThe agency shall develop and implement a program that 178 requires Medicaid practitioners who issue written prescriptions 179 for medicinal drugs to use a counterfeit-proof prescription pad 180 for Medicaid prescriptions. The agency shall require the use of 181 standardized counterfeit-proof prescription pads by prescribers 182 who issue written prescriptions for Medicaid recipients. The 183 agency may implement the program in targeted geographic areas or 184 statewide. 185 6.âThe agency may enter into arrangements that require 186 manufacturers of generic drugs prescribed to Medicaid recipients 187 to provide rebates of at least 15.1 percent of the average 188 manufacturer price for the manufacturerâs generic products. 189 These arrangements must shall require that if a generic-drug 190 manufacturer pays federal rebates for Medicaid-reimbursed drugs 191 at a level below 15.1 percent, the manufacturer must provide a 192 supplemental rebate to the state in an amount necessary to 193 achieve a 15.1-percent rebate level. 194 7.âThe agency may establish a preferred drug list as 195 described in this subsection, and, pursuant to the establishment 196 of such preferred drug list, negotiate supplemental rebates from 197 manufacturers that are in addition to those required by Title 198 XIX of the Social Security Act and at no less than 14 percent of 199 the average manufacturer price as defined in 42 U.S.C. s. 1936 200 on the last day of a quarter unless the federal or supplemental 201 rebate, or both, equals or exceeds 29 percent. There is no upper 202 limit on the supplemental rebates the agency may negotiate. The 203 agency may determine that specific products, brand-name or 204 generic, are competitive at lower rebate percentages. Agreement 205 to pay the minimum supplemental rebate percentage guarantees a 206 manufacturer that the Medicaid Pharmaceutical and Therapeutics 207 Committee will consider a product for inclusion on the preferred 208 drug list. However, a pharmaceutical manufacturer is not 209 guaranteed placement on the preferred drug list by simply paying 210 the minimum supplemental rebate. Agency decisions will be made 211 on the clinical efficacy of a drug and recommendations of the 212 Medicaid Pharmaceutical and Therapeutics Committee, as well as 213 the price of competing products minus federal and state rebates. 214 The agency may contract with an outside agency or contractor to 215 conduct negotiations for supplemental rebates. For the purposes 216 of this section, the term âsupplemental rebatesâ means cash 217 rebates. Value-added programs as a substitution for supplemental 218 rebates are prohibited. The agency may seek any federal waivers 219 to implement this initiative. 220 8.a.âThe agency may implement a Medicaid behavioral drug 221 management system. The agency may contract with a vendor that 222 has experience in operating behavioral drug management systems 223 to implement this program. The agency may seek federal waivers 224 to implement this program. 225 b.âThe agency, in conjunction with the Department of 226 Children and Families, may implement the Medicaid behavioral 227 drug management system that is designed to improve the quality 228 of care and behavioral health prescribing practices based on 229 best practice guidelines, improve patient adherence to 230 medication plans, reduce clinical risk, and lower prescribed 231 drug costs and the rate of inappropriate spending on Medicaid 232 behavioral drugs. The program may include the following 233 elements: 234 (I)âProvide for the development and adoption of best 235 practice guidelines for behavioral health-related drugs such as 236 antipsychotics, antidepressants, and medications for treating 237 bipolar disorders and other behavioral conditions; translate 238 them into practice; review behavioral health prescribers and 239 compare their prescribing patterns to a number of indicators 240 that are based on national standards; and determine deviations 241 from best practice guidelines. 242 (II)âImplement processes for providing feedback to and 243 educating prescribers using best practice educational materials 244 and peer-to-peer consultation. 245 (III)âAssess Medicaid beneficiaries who are outliers in 246 their use of behavioral health drugs with regard to the numbers 247 and types of drugs taken, drug dosages, combination drug 248 therapies, and other indicators of improper use of behavioral 249 health drugs. 250 (IV)âAlert prescribers to patients who fail to refill 251 prescriptions in a timely fashion, are prescribed multiple same 252 class behavioral health drugs, and may have other potential 253 medication problems. 254 (V)âTrack spending trends for behavioral health drugs and 255 deviation from best practice guidelines. 256 (VI)âUse educational and technological approaches to 257 promote best practices, educate consumers, and train prescribers 258 in the use of practice guidelines. 259 (VII)âDisseminate electronic and published materials. 260 (VIII)âHold statewide and regional conferences. 261 (IX)âImplement a disease management program with a model 262 quality-based medication component for severely mentally ill 263 individuals and emotionally disturbed children who are high 264 users of care. 265 9.âThe agency shall implement a Medicaid prescription drug 266 management system. 267 a.âThe agency may contract with a vendor that has 268 experience in operating prescription drug management systems in 269 order to implement this system. Any management system that is 270 implemented in accordance with this subparagraph must rely on 271 cooperation between physicians and pharmacists to determine 272 appropriate practice patterns and clinical guidelines to improve 273 the prescribing, dispensing, and use of drugs in the Medicaid 274 program. The agency may seek federal waivers to implement this 275 program. 276 b.âThe drug management system must be designed to improve 277 the quality of care and prescribing practices based on best 278 practice guidelines, improve patient adherence to medication 279 plans, reduce clinical risk, and lower prescribed drug costs and 280 the rate of inappropriate spending on Medicaid prescription 281 drugs. The program must: 282 (I)âProvide for the adoption of best practice guidelines 283 for the prescribing and use of drugs in the Medicaid program, 284 including translating best practice guidelines into practice; 285 reviewing prescriber patterns and comparing them to indicators 286 that are based on national standards and practice patterns of 287 clinical peers in their community, statewide, and nationally; 288 and determine deviations from best practice guidelines. 289 (II)âImplement processes for providing feedback to and 290 educating prescribers using best practice educational materials 291 and peer-to-peer consultation. 292 (III)âAssess Medicaid recipients who are outliers in their 293 use of a single or multiple prescription drugs with regard to 294 the numbers and types of drugs taken, drug dosages, combination 295 drug therapies, and other indicators of improper use of 296 prescription drugs. 297 (IV)âAlert prescribers to recipients who fail to refill 298 prescriptions in a timely fashion, are prescribed multiple drugs 299 that may be redundant or contraindicated, or may have other 300 potential medication problems. 301 10.âThe agency may contract for drug rebate administration, 302 including, but not limited to, calculating rebate amounts, 303 invoicing manufacturers, negotiating disputes with 304 manufacturers, and maintaining a database of rebate collections. 305 11.âThe agency may specify the preferred daily dosing form 306 or strength for the purpose of promoting best practices with 307 regard to the prescribing of certain drugs as specified in the 308 General Appropriations Act and ensuring cost-effective 309 prescribing practices. 310 12.âThe agency may require prior authorization for 311 Medicaid-covered prescribed drugs. The agency may prior 312 authorize the use of a product: 313 a.âFor an indication not approved in labeling; 314 b.âTo comply with certain clinical guidelines; or 315 c.âIf the product has the potential for overuse, misuse, or 316 abuse. 317 318 The agency may require the prescribing professional to provide 319 information about the rationale and supporting medical evidence 320 for the use of a drug. The agency shall post prior 321 authorization, step-edit criteria and protocol, and updates to 322 the list of drugs that are subject to prior authorization on the 323 agencyâs Internet website within 21 days after the prior 324 authorization and step-edit criteria and protocol and updates 325 are approved by the agency. For purposes of this subparagraph, 326 the term âstep-editâ means an automatic electronic review of 327 certain medications subject to prior authorization. 328 13.âThe agency, in conjunction with the Pharmaceutical and 329 Therapeutics Committee, may require age-related prior 330 authorizations for certain prescribed drugs. The agency may 331 preauthorize the use of a drug for a recipient who may not meet 332 the age requirement or may exceed the length of therapy for use 333 of this product as recommended by the manufacturer and approved 334 by the Food and Drug Administration. Prior authorization may 335 require the prescribing professional to provide information 336 about the rationale and supporting medical evidence for the use 337 of a drug. 338 14.âThe agency shall implement a step-therapy prior 339 authorization approval process for medications excluded from the 340 preferred drug list. Medications listed on the preferred drug 341 list must be used within the previous 12 months before the 342 alternative medications that are not listed. The step-therapy 343 prior authorization may require the prescriber to use the 344 medications of a similar drug class or for a similar medical 345 indication unless contraindicated in the Food and Drug 346 Administration labeling. The trial period between the specified 347 steps may vary according to the medical indication. The step 348 therapy approval process must shall be developed in accordance 349 with the committee as stated in s. 409.91195(7) and (8). A drug 350 product may be approved, or, in the case of a drug product for 351 the treatment of a serious mental illness, must be approved, 352 without meeting the step-therapy prior authorization criteria if 353 the prescribing physician provides the agency with additional 354 written medical or clinical documentation that the product is 355 medically necessary because: 356 a.âThere is not a drug on the preferred drug list to treat 357 the disease or medical condition which is an acceptable clinical 358 alternative; 359 b.âThe alternatives have been ineffective in the treatment 360 of the beneficiaryâs disease; 361 c.âThe drug product or medication of a similar drug class 362 is prescribed for the treatment of a serious mental illness 363 schizophrenia or schizotypal or delusional disorders; prior 364 authorization has been granted previously for the prescribed 365 drug; and the medication was dispensed to the patient during the 366 previous 12 months; or 367 d.âBased on historical evidence and known characteristics 368 of the patient and the drug, the drug is likely to be 369 ineffective, or the number of doses have been ineffective. 370 371 The agency shall work with the physician to determine the best 372 alternative for the patient. The agency may adopt rules waiving 373 the requirements for written clinical documentation for specific 374 drugs in limited clinical situations. 375 15.âThe agency shall implement a return and reuse program 376 for drugs dispensed by pharmacies to institutional recipients, 377 which includes payment of a $5 restocking fee for the 378 implementation and operation of the program. The return and 379 reuse program must shall be implemented electronically and in a 380 manner that promotes efficiency. The program must permit a 381 pharmacy to exclude drugs from the program if it is not 382 practical or cost-effective for the drug to be included and must 383 provide for the return to inventory of drugs that cannot be 384 credited or returned in a cost-effective manner. The agency 385 shall determine whether if the program has reduced the amount of 386 Medicaid prescription drugs which are destroyed on an annual 387 basis and whether if there are additional ways to ensure more 388 prescription drugs are not destroyed and which could safely be 389 reused. 390 Section 3.âParagraph (a) of subsection (20) of section 391 409.910, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 392 409.910âResponsibility for payments on behalf of Medicaid 393 eligible persons when other parties are liable.â 394 (20)(a)âEntities providing health insurance as defined in 395 s. 624.603, health maintenance organizations and prepaid health 396 clinics as defined in chapter 641, and, on behalf of their 397 clients, third-party administrators, pharmacy benefits managers, 398 and any other third parties, as defined in s. 409.901 s. 399 409.901(27), which are legally responsible for payment of a 400 claim for a health care item or service as a condition of doing 401 business in this the state or providing coverage to residents of 402 this state, shall provide such records and information as are 403 necessary to accomplish the purpose of this section, unless such 404 requirement results in an unreasonable burden. 405 Section 4.âThe Agency for Health Care Administration is 406 directed to include the rate impact of this act in the Medicaid 407 managed medical assistance program and long-term care managed 408 care program rates that become effective on October 1, 2026. 409 This section shall take effect upon this act becoming a law. 410 Section 5.âExcept as otherwise expressly provided in this 411 act and except for this section, which shall take effect upon 412 this act becoming a law, this act shall take effect October 1, 413 2026.